Oklahoma, session 2025, SB246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

Req. No. 1359 Page 1


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18-126 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. In accordance with the provisions of subsection B of this


section, a public school district or charter school may designate a


certified classroom teacher with a master, exemplary, or recognized


designation for a five-year period. Public school districts and


charter schools shall use the following criteria, at a minimum, to


designate a certified classroom teacher:


1. A recognized designation shall be awarded when generally a


minimum of fifty-five percent (55%) of the teacher’s students are


meeting or exceeding expected growth targets;


2. An exemplary designation shall be awarded when generally a


minimum of sixty percent (60%) of the teacher’s students are meeting


or exceeding expected growth targets; and


3. A master designation shall be awarded when generally a


minimum of seventy percent (70%) of the teacher’s students are


meeting or exceeding expected growth targets.


B. The State Board of Education shall establish performance and


validity standards for local optional teacher designation systems.


The performance standards shall:


1. Provide a mathematical possibility that all teachers


eligible for a designation may earn the designation;



Req. No. 1359 Page 2


2. Provide a process to weight designations to incentivize


individual student academic growth in English language arts,


mathematics, and writing; and


3. Require a quantitative metric for teacher designation


assessment and evaluation.


C. The State Board of Education shall:


1. Ensure that local optional teacher designation systems meet


the requirements of subsection B of this section; and


2. Collaborate with the Office of Educational Quality and


Accountability to monitor the quality and fairness of local optional


teacher designation systems in accordance with the provisions of


this section.


D. The State Department of Education shall:


1. Develop and provide technical assistance for public school


districts and charter schools that request assistance in


implementing a local optional teacher designation system;


2. Periodically conduct evaluations of the effectiveness of the


local optional teacher designation systems implemented pursuant to


this section and the Distinguished Educator Allotments implemented


pursuant to Section 2 of this act and electronically report the


results of the evaluations to the Governor, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives. A public school district or charter school that


has implemented a local optional teacher designation system or

Req. No. 1359 Page 3


received Distinguished Educator Allotment funds pursuant to Section


of this act shall participate in the evaluations; and


3. Collect information necessary to implement the provisions of


this section.


E. The State Board of Education may adopt fees to implement the


provisions of this section and may promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18-126.1 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Board of Education shall provide Distinguished


Educator Allotments for each classroom teacher granted a master,


exemplary, or recognized teacher designation pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1 of this act who is employed by a public


school district or charter school. The employing public school


district or charter school shall receive an amount equal to the


following base amounts increased by the pupil category factor


provided for in subsection B of this section:


1. Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00), or an increased amount


not to exceed Thirty-two Thousand Dollars ($32,000.00) as determined


pursuant to subsection B of this section, for each teacher with a


master designation;


2. Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00), or an increased amount not


to exceed Eighteen Thousand Dollars ($18,000.00) as determined

Req. No. 1359 Page 4


pursuant to subsection B of this section, for each teacher with an


exemplary designation; and


3. Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), or an increased amount


not to exceed Nine Thousand Dollars ($9,000.00) as determined


pursuant to subsection B of this section, for each teacher with a


recognized designation.


B. The pupil category factor shall be determined by multiplying


the following applicable amounts by the point value assigned to each


student at a public school district or charter school campus


pursuant to subsection D of this section:


1. Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for each teacher with a


master designation;


2. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for each


teacher with an exemplary designation; and


3. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each teacher with a


recognized designation.


C. Point values determined by the public school district or


charter school for each student shall be linked to student academic


growth in reading or mathematics recorded by statewide student


assessments administered pursuant to Section 1210.508 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes through calculation of individual student


performance levels and corresponding cut scores determined by the


Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability pursuant to


Section 1210.541 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Below basic

Req. No. 1359 Page 5


low, below basic high, basic low, basic high, proficient low,


proficient high, advanced low, and advanced high shall have the same


meaning as the the academic growth indicator adopted by the State


Board of Education for the accountability system adopted pursuant to


Section 1210.545 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. Point values for each student at a public school district or


charter school shall be assigned as follows:


1. Zero (0) points for a student who experienced no change in


performance level from the previous year to the current year;


2. One-quarter (0.25) point for performance level increases of:


a. below basic low in the previous year to below basic


high in the current year,


b. basic low in the previous year to basic high in the


current year,


c. proficient low in the previous year to proficient high


in the current year, and


d. advanced low in the previous year to advanced high in


the current year;


3. One-half (0.5) point for a performance level increase from


proficient low or proficient high in the previous year to advanced


low or advanced high in the current year;


4. Two (2.0) points for a performance level increase from below


basic low or below basic high in the previous year to basic low or


basic high in the current year;

Req. No. 1359 Page 6


5. Three (3.0) points for a performance level increase from


basic low or basic high in the previous year to proficient low or


proficient high in the current year;


6. Four (4.0) points for a performance level increase from


basic low or basic high in the previous year to advanced low or


advanced high in the current year;


7. Five points (5.0) for a performance level increase from


below basic low or below basic high in the previous year to


proficient low or proficient high in the current year;


8. Six points (6.0) for a performance level increase from below


basic low or below basic high in the previous year to advanced low


or advanced high in the current year; and


9. For any student whose performance level decreased or moved


inversely to the changes described in paragraphs 2 through 8 of this


subsection, the assigned point value shall be the negative


equivalent of the corresponding positive point value.


Performance levels for the current year shall mean mathematics or


reading performance levels calculated based on a student’s


performance on statewide student assessments completed the year the


student was taught by a teacher with a designation.


E. A public school district or charter school shall be entitled


to receive increased Distinguished Educator Allotments pursuant to


this section in the amount necessary for reimbursement for any fees


paid pursuant to Section 1 of this act.

Req. No. 1359 Page 7


F. The State Department of Education shall annually make


available to the public on its website a list of public school


districts and charter schools with the projected Distinguished


Educator Allotments per teacher designation at each public school


district or charter school campus.


G. A public school district or charter school shall annually


certify that funds received pursuant to this section were used in


the following manner:


1. At least ninety percent (90%) of each allotment received


pursuant to subsection B of this section was used for increased


compensation of a teacher with a master, exemplary, or recognized


designation; and


2. Any other funds received pursuant to this section were used


for costs associated with implementing Section 1 of this act


including efforts to support teachers in obtaining master,


exemplary, or recognized designations.


H. The portion of the Distinguished Educator Allotments used


for increased compensation of the teacher shall:


1. Be awarded for as long as the teacher maintains his or her


designation according to the local optional teacher designation


system adopted pursuant to Section 1 of this act;


2. Not be a part of a continuing contract of a teacher;


3. Not be considered as salary and/or fringe benefits pursuant


to Section 18-114.15 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 1359 Page 8


4. Be excluded from the compensation of a teacher for the


purposes of calculating retirement pursuant to the Teachers’


Retirement System of Oklahoma; and


5. Not be subject to taxes levied by the Federal Insurance


Contributions Act (FICA), to the extent such an exemption is


provided by federal law.


I. A public school district or charter school responsible for


instruction of students during their first year participating in


statewide student assessments administered pursuant to Section


1210.508 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall receive


Distinguished Educator Allotments per teacher. Point values for


each student at a public school district or charter school subject


to the provisions of this subsection shall be assigned as follows:


1. Zero (0.0) points for a student who performs at or below the


state average in academic performance in mathematics or reading;


2. Two (2.0) points for a student who performs above the state


average in academic performance in mathematics or reading;


3. Negative one (-1.0) point for a student who performs below


basic low or below basic high in academic performance in mathematics


or reading; and


4. Negative one-half (-0.5) point for a students who performs


basic low in academic performance in mathematics or reading.





Req. No. 1359 Page 9


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 18-126.2 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the State Board of Education to be designated the “Distinguished


Educator Allotments Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing


fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of


all monies received by the State Board of Education from state


appropriations provided for the purpose of implementing the


provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this act. All monies accruing to


the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted


and expended by the State Board of Education for the purpose


provided for in this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be


made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims


filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


SECTION 4. There is hereby appropriated to the Distinguished


Educator Allotments Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 3 of


this act from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the General


Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year ending June


30, 2023, the sum of Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) or so


much thereof as may be necessary to implement the provisions of


Sections 1 and 2 of this act.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 1359 Page 10


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1359 EB 12/30/2024 5:41:24 PM





































Req. No. 1359 Page 11